North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8. Evidence.
Article 12. Inspection and Production of Writings. [Repealed]

§ 8-89.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1967, c. 954, s. 4.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to discovery and production of documents for inspection, copying or photographing, see

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 34.

§ 8-89.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 762, s. 4.

§§ 8-90,
8-91.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1967, c. 954, s. 4.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to discovery and production of documents for inspection, copying or photographing, see

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 34.

§§ 8-92 through 8-96.

Reserved for future codification purposes.